Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2

Administrators and Registrars

2-12-201. Employment of election administrators and clerical assistants.

The commission shall appoint an administrator of elections who shall be the chief administrative officer of the commission and who shall be responsible for the daily operations of the office and the execution of all elections. The duties of the administrator of elections may, upon the administrator's discretion, be performed by a designee. Such duties include, but are not limited to, the following:

Employment of all office personnel; after July 1, 2011, administrators of elections may not appoint or hire, except in the event of and during an emergency, members of the county election commission, or spouses, parents, brothers, sisters or children, including in-laws of commission members or spouses, parents, brothers, sisters or children, including in-laws of the administrator of elections as deputies, clerical assistants, absentee voting deputies, machine technicians, poll officials or as members of the absentee counting board;

Preparation of the annual operating budget and presentation of such budget to the election commission for approval;

Upon approval by the county election commission, presentation of the annual budget to the county commission or other legislative body for funding;

Requisition and purchase of any supplies necessary for the operation of the election commission office and the conduct of all elections;

Maintenance of voter registration files, campaign disclosure records, and any other records required by this title;

Conducting of instruction class for poll workers or designation of another qualified person to conduct such class;

Preparation of all notices for publication required by this title;

Preparation and maintenance of all fiscal records necessary for the daily operation of the election commission office and all elections. This may include any requests for funding or changes in funding, if necessary, after adoption of the current fiscal budget;

Compilation, maintenance and dissemination of information to the public, the candidates, the voters, the press and all inquiring parties in regard to all aspects of the electoral process on all governmental levels;

Promotion of the electoral process through supplemental registrations, public functions, press releases and media advertising whenever possible;

Attendance at any required seminar and other educational seminars, as funding permits, to gain knowledge beneficial to the administration of the election commission office or to the electoral process;

Having knowledge of all current laws pertaining to the election process and any changes mandated by the general assembly, and apprising the election commission, office staff, candidates, the press and the public in general of this information;

Assistance in the planning and implementation of any plan of apportionment or reapportionment of any governmental entity involved in the electoral process;

The county election commissioners may not employ themselves or any of their spouses, parents, siblings, in-laws or children as administrator;

Preparation of a plan for placing precinct voting locations and presentation of such plan to the election commission for approval;

Preparation of a plan for early voting sites and presentation of such plan to the election commission for approval; and

Upon request, assist the:

City councils, as appropriate, for cities located in the county;

County legislative body;

Local board of education; and

Members of the general assembly representing the county, concerning redistricting in 2012, and thereafter every two-year period following each decennial census taken by the United States census bureau.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1209; Acts 1993, ch. 518, §§ 3, 21; 1999, ch. 197, § 12; 1999, ch. 232, § 1; 2011, ch. 109, §§ 1-3; 2011, ch. 236, § 2; 2013, ch. 268, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 6.

2-12-202. Precinct registrars and assistants — Appointment and duties.

The majority party members of the county election commission shall appoint one (1) precinct registrar for each polling place, and the minority party members of the commission shall appoint one (1) precinct registrar for each polling place. The appointments shall be made for each election.

The commission may appoint for each polling place for each election only as many assistant precinct registrars as may be necessary to expedite voting.

Precinct registrars and assistant precinct registrars shall perform the duties imposed by this title and duties assigned them by the county election commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1210; Acts 1993, ch. 518, §§ 4, 21; 2013, ch. 268, §§ 4, 5.

2-12-203. Precinct registrars and assistants — Compensation.

For each day's attendance upon registration periods and for attendance at the polls, precinct registrars and assistant precinct registrars shall be paid a minimum of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per day. The compensation may be increased by resolution of the county legislative body.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1211.

2-12-204. Absent precinct registrars.

If a precinct registrar is absent on a day fixed for registration or for an election, the commissioners representing the same party as the absent registrar shall select a person who meets the requirements of this chapter to act for the absent precinct registrar during the period of such precinct registrar's absence.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1212.

2-12-205. Removal of precinct registrars for violation of oath.

The commission may remove any precinct registrar for violation of such registrar's oath as a registrar.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1213.

2-12-206. Death or resignation of precinct registrars.

If a precinct registrar dies, resigns or is removed, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the commissioners representing the same party as the registrar. The new appointee shall serve for the unexpired term of the person whom such appointee replaces.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1214.

2-12-207. Administration of oaths.

The administrator of elections, deputies, precinct registrars and assistant precinct registrars may administer oaths in the performance of their duties.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1215.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-12-208. Compensation of certified administrators of elections.

Any administrator of elections employed pursuant to § 2-12-201, who has been certified under § 2-11-202(b), shall receive as a base minimum yearly salary at least ninety percent (90%) of the base salary of the county's assessor of property, as provided in § 67-1-508, if the office of such administrator of elections is open five (5) full days a week. If any administrator of elections' base minimum yearly salary is less than ninety percent (90%) of the base salary of the county's assessor of property on June 18, 2005, then such administrator's salary shall be increased by five percent (5%) per year until such administrator's base minimum yearly salary equals ninety percent (90%) of the base salary of the county's assessor of property; provided, that nothing in this subsection (a) shall prohibit adjustment of an administrator's base minimum yearly salary at a rate greater than five percent (5%) per year.

The minimum salaries for certified administrators provided by this section shall be paid by the county for which such administrator is employed. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a county from paying its administrator more than the minimum salary provided by this section.

For the purposes of classifying the counties under this section, the population classifications established in § 8-24-101 shall be applicable. For the purpose of establishing the compensation of certified administrators, the schedule established in § 8-24-102 shall be applicable for the certified administrators in their respective counties effective July 1, 1996.

For the purpose of phasing in the compensation schedule provided in this section no administrator shall receive more than a seven percent (7%) increase in the 1996-97 fiscal year. If any subsequent year's increase provides for an increase of more than ten percent (10%) in any fiscal year, then the remaining increase that exceeds ten percent (10%) shall be carried over to subsequent years until the compensation provided for is obtained.

The population of counties for purposes of this section shall be determined by the 1990 federal census or the most recent succeeding federal census or a special census as provided in § 8-24-102(c).

On July 1, 1997, and each July 1 thereafter, the compensation for certified administrators as provided by this section, shall be increased by a dollar amount equal to the average annualized general increase in state employee's compensation during the prior fiscal year multiplied by the compensation established for the county officials of the county with the median population of all counties; provided, in no year shall such compensation increase by more than ten percent (10%). On or before May 1 of each year, the commissioner of finance and administration shall certify to the comptroller of the treasury the average annualized general increase in state employee's compensation during that fiscal year.

Acts 1986, ch. 930, § 1; 1996, ch. 1081, §§ 3-5, 8; 2005, ch. 470, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

For the fiscal year county officials salary schedule, see the County Technical Assistance Service web site at http://www.ctas.tennessee.edu.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

2-12-209. State contribution to compensation of certified administrators of elections.

The state shall pay to the general fund of every county in which the administrator of elections is or becomes certified under the provisions of § 2-11-202(b), the sum of eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000) in the manner set out in subsection (b) of this section.

In years in which the secretary of state is required to reduce the department of state's budget, the secretary is authorized to reduce any appropriations authorized by this section up to nine percent (9%).

The state payments to a county made pursuant to this section shall be paid quarterly in amounts of four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500) per quarter.

If an administrator becomes certified at some time other than the beginning of a quarter, such payments to the county shall commence at the beginning of the quarter next following the administrator's certification.

If an administrator in a county receiving quarterly payments under this section loses certification for whatever reason, such administrator shall have six (6) months from the date of such loss to regain such certification. If the administrator has not done so at the end of six (6) months, state payments to the county pursuant to this section shall cease until the quarter next following the quarter such administrator regains certification.

If the office of administrator in a county receiving quarterly payments under this section becomes vacant for whatever reason, the new administrator shall have six (6) months from the date of taking office to become certified. If the new administrator has not become certified at the end of six (6) months, state payments to the county pursuant to this section shall cease until the quarter next following the quarter such new administrator becomes certified.

No county receiving payments pursuant to this section shall reduce the total amount of funds appropriated to such county's election commission below the total amount appropriated to such commission in previous comparable election and non-election years.

If a county election commission is of the opinion that the county legislative body has not appropriated an amount of funds for its budget that is comparable to previous years as prohibited by subdivision (c)(1), it shall, by petitioning the state election coordinator, have the right to a hearing on such matter before an administrative law judge in the office of the secretary of state.

Within ten (10) days of receiving such petition, the state election coordinator shall set a hearing date, which date shall be within thirty (30) days of receiving the petition. The county mayor and county election commission shall be notified of the time, place and date of the hearing by registered mail, return receipt requested, at least ten (10) days prior to such hearing.

The hearing shall be held before an administrative law judge from the office of the secretary of state. None of the parties involved in the hearing shall be required to have an attorney present.

The judge shall examine all evidence produced at the hearing, including the total appropriations made to the election commission of such county in previous comparable election or non-election years. Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the judge shall determine whether the total amount of funds appropriated to the election commission of such county is comparable to the amount it appropriated to such commission in previous election or non-election years.

If the judge determines that the total amount appropriated to the county election commission is not comparable to previous years, and such county is receiving state payments pursuant to this section, the judge shall so certify to the state official responsible for authorizing such payments. Upon receiving certification from the judge pursuant to this subdivision (c)(2)(E), such state official shall cease authorization of payment to such county effective the quarter next following the one in which such certification is received.

In addition to the remedy set out in subdivision (c)(2), the county election commission of any county receiving state payments under this section which so reduces election appropriations shall also be authorized to seek a writ of mandamus to compel the county legislative body to comply with the provisions of this subsection (c).

Acts 1986, ch. 930, § 1; 1996, ch. 1081, §§ 6, 7; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2003, ch. 355, § 54.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000(d).

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

2-12-210. Status as county employee unchanged.

Nothing in Acts 1986, ch. 930 shall be construed as conferring upon any county election commission, administrator of elections or any other county election official, status as a state employee. All such persons shall be subject to all applicable purchasing and budgetary laws of such county.

Acts 1986, ch. 930, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For translation of Acts 1986, ch. 930 see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. County purchasing laws, title 5, ch. 14.